Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1316.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2920.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-2920.01. Arizona rural health transformation fund; public meetings; expenditure plan; joint legislative budget committee approval A. The Arizona rural health transformation fund is established consisting of monies received by this state through the rural health transformation program prescribed in Section 71401 of Public Law 119-21.  The Arizona health care cost containment system shall administer the fund.  Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. B. Before the executive branch may spend any of the monies in the Arizona rural health transformation fund, the Arizona health care cost containment system shall hold three public meetings in each of the largest metropolitan areas in northern, central and southern Arizona to receive input and feedback regarding how the monies should be spent.  After the three meetings have been held, the Arizona health care cost containment system shall submit an expenditure plan for the monies received through the Rural health transformation program prescribed in Section 71401 of Public Law 119-21 to the joint legislative budget committee for approval. END_STATUTE